Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
Section 2 of this 2025 Act is added to and made a part of ORS chapter 278.
SECTION 2. (1) Not later than January 31 of each even-numbered year, the Oregon De-
partment of  Administrative Services shall research, compile, prepare and deliver to the
Legislative Assembly in accordance with ORS 192.245 a report on the financial  condition and
stability of the Insurance Fund established under ORS 278.425. The  report, at a minimum,
must examine and provide:
(a) An overview of the purpose, uses and structure of the Insurance Fund;
(b) The unencumbered balance of  the Insurance Fund as of December 31 of the year
preceding the year in which the report is due;
(c) A list of the claims the Insurance Fund has closed in the previous two years in which
the amount paid exceeds $1 million;
(d) A list of the amounts, rates and apportionment  of the assessments, charges and
contributions that state agencies and other participants currently pay into the Insurance
Fund and a trend  line or other measurement that shows increases or decreases in the as-
sessments, charges or contributions within the previous two years;
(e) The date and results of  the last audit of the Insurance Fund that the department
performed or had another person perform;
(f) An accounting of moneys that were advanced to the Insurance  Fund from other funds
in the State Treasury  that shows the amount and date of each advance, the source of the
advance, the reason and purpose  for the advance and the current terms and conditions and
progress of repayments of the advance; and
(g) An evaluation of the actuarial soundness of the Insurance Fund.
(2) In  addition to the items listed in subsection (1) of this section, the report must re-
commend strategies  and actions necessary to achieve and maintain the solvency and
actuarial soundness of the Insurance Fund and all components of the Insurance Fund.
(3) The department may  contract with an entity outside of state government to conduct
or assist  with conducting the research, compilation and preparation of the report described
in subsection (1) of this section.
Enrolled Senate Bill 463 (SB 463-B) Page 1
(4) All agencies of state government, as defined in ORS 174.111, and  all other participants
in the Insurance Fund, are directed to cooperate with  and assist the department in carrying
out the department’s duties under this section.
SECTION 3. The Oregon Department of  Administrative Services shall submit the first
instance of the report described in  section 2 of this 2025 Act not later than January 31, 2026.
SECTION 4. This 2025 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency  is declared to exist, and this 2025 Act takes effect
on its passage.
Passed by Senate April 10, 2025
Repassed by Senate May 28, 2025
..................................................................................
Obadiah Rutledge, Secretary of Senate
..................................................................................
Rob Wagner, President of Senate
Passed by House May 15, 2025
..................................................................................
Julie Fahey, Speaker of House
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tobias Read, Secretary of State
Enrolled Senate Bill 463 (SB 463-B) Page 2